third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
FLAG num
#arbeiðsøki
SFX 249 N 11
SFX 249 0 øki .
SFX 249 0 økið .
SFX 249 0 økini .
SFX 249 0 økinum .
SFX 249 0 økir .
SFX 249 0 økis .
SFX 249 0 økisins .
SFX 249 0 økja .
SFX 249 0 økjanna .
SFX 249 0 økjum .
SFX 249 0 økjunum .

#bithorn
SFX 250 N 11
SFX 250 0 horn .
SFX 250 0 horna .
SFX 250 0 hornanna .
SFX 250 0 horni .
SFX 250 0 hornið .
SFX 250 0 hornini .
SFX 250 0 horninum .
SFX 250 0 horns .
SFX 250 0 hornsins .
SFX 250 0 hornum .
SFX 250 0 hornunum .

#avtala
SFX 251 N 11
SFX 251 0 tala .
SFX 251 0 talan .
SFX 251 0 talanna .
SFX 251 0 talu .
SFX 251 0 talum .
SFX 251 0 taluna .
SFX 251 0 taluni .
SFX 251 0 talunnar .
SFX 251 0 talunum .
SFX 251 0 talur .
SFX 251 0 talurnar .

#afturendi
SFX 252 N 12
SFX 252 0 enda .
SFX 252 0 endan .
SFX 252 0 endanna .
SFX 252 0 endans .
SFX 252 0 endanum .
SFX 252 0 endar .
SFX 252 0 endarnar .
SFX 252 0 endarnir .
SFX 252 0 endi .
SFX 252 0 endin .
SFX 252 0 endum .
SFX 252 0 endunum .

#aldursbólkur
SFX 253 N 15
SFX 253 0 bólk .
SFX 253 0 bólka .
SFX 253 0 bólkanna .
SFX 253 0 bólkar .
SFX 253 0 bólkarnar .
SFX 253 0 bólkarnir .
SFX 253 0 bólki .
SFX 253 0 bólkin .
SFX 253 0 bólkinum .
SFX 253 0 bólks .
SFX 253 0 bólksins .
SFX 253 0 bólkum .
SFX 253 0 bólkunum .
SFX 253 0 bólkur .
SFX 253 0 bólkurin .

#afturbragd
SFX 254 N 12
SFX 254 0 bragd .
SFX 254 0 bragda .
SFX 254 0 bragdanna .
SFX 254 0 bragdi .
SFX 254 0 bragdið .
SFX 254 0 bragdinum .
SFX 254 0 bragds .
SFX 254 0 bragdsins .
SFX 254 0 brøgd .
SFX 254 0 brøgdini .
SFX 254 0 brøgdum .
SFX 254 0 brøgdunum .

#bandadansur
SFX 255 N 13
SFX 255 0 a .
SFX 255 0 anna .
SFX 255 0 i .
SFX 255 0 in .
SFX 255 0 ins .
SFX 255 0 inum .
SFX 255 0 ir .
SFX 255 0 irnar .
SFX 255 0 irnir .
SFX 255 0 um .
SFX 255 0 unum .
SFX 255 0 ur .
SFX 255 0 urin .

#blettur
SFX 256 N 14
SFX 256 t s .
SFX 256 t sins .
SFX 256 0 a .
SFX 256 0 anna .
SFX 256 0 i .
SFX 256 0 in .
SFX 256 0 inum .
SFX 256 0 ir .
SFX 256 0 irnar .
SFX 256 0 irnir .
SFX 256 0 um .
SFX 256 0 unum .
SFX 256 0 ur .
SFX 256 0 urin .

#afturlimur
SFX 257 N 15
SFX 257 0 lim .
SFX 257 0 lima .
SFX 257 0 limanna .
SFX 257 0 limar .
SFX 257 0 limarins .
SFX 257 0 limi .
SFX 257 0 limin .
SFX 257 0 liminum .
SFX 257 0 limir .
SFX 257 0 limirnar .
SFX 257 0 limirnir .
SFX 257 0 limum .
SFX 257 0 limunum .
SFX 257 0 limur .
SFX 257 0 limurin .

#avseting
SFX 258 N 11
SFX 258 0 seting .
SFX 258 0 setinga .
SFX 258 0 setinganna .
SFX 258 0 setingar .
SFX 258 0 setingarinnar .
SFX 258 0 setingarnar .
SFX 258 0 setingin .
SFX 258 0 setingina .
SFX 258 0 setingini .
SFX 258 0 setingum .
SFX 258 0 setingunum .

#afturgongd
SFX 259 N 6
SFX 259 0 gongd .
SFX 259 0 gongdar .
SFX 259 0 gongdarinnar .
SFX 259 0 gongdin .
SFX 259 0 gongdina .
SFX 259 0 gongdini .

#bandasavn
SFX 260 N 12
SFX 260 0 savn .
SFX 260 0 savna .
SFX 260 0 savnanna .
SFX 260 0 savni .
SFX 260 0 savnið .
SFX 260 0 savninum .
SFX 260 0 savns .
SFX 260 0 savnsins .
SFX 260 0 søvn .
SFX 260 0 søvnini .
SFX 260 0 søvnum .
SFX 260 0 søvnunum .

#álvaleikur
SFX 261 N 15
SFX 261 0 leik .
SFX 261 0 leika .
SFX 261 0 leikanna .
SFX 261 0 leiki .
SFX 261 0 leikin .
SFX 261 0 leikinum .
SFX 261 0 leikir .
SFX 261 0 leikirnar .
SFX 261 0 leikirnir .
SFX 261 0 leiks .
SFX 261 0 leiksins .
SFX 261 0 leikum .
SFX 261 0 leikunum .
SFX 261 0 leikur .
SFX 261 0 leikurin .

#avboð
SFX 262 N 11
SFX 262 0 boð .
SFX 262 0 boða .
SFX 262 0 boðanna .
SFX 262 0 boði .
SFX 262 0 boðið .
SFX 262 0 boðini .
SFX 262 0 boðnum .
SFX 262 0 boðs .
SFX 262 0 boðsins .
SFX 262 0 boðum .
SFX 262 0 boðunum .

#bjartoygdur
SFX 263 N 9
SFX 263 0 oygd .
SFX 263 0 oygda .
SFX 263 0 oygdan .
SFX 263 0 oygdar .
SFX 263 0 oygdari .
SFX 263 0 oygdir .
SFX 263 0 oygdum .
SFX 263 0 oygdur .
SFX 263 0 oygt .

#altarsklæddur
SFX 264 N 11
SFX 264 0 klædd .
SFX 264 0 klædda .
SFX 264 0 klæddan .
SFX 264 0 klæddar .
SFX 264 0 klæddari .
SFX 264 0 klæddir .
SFX 264 0 klæddum .
SFX 264 0 klæddur .
SFX 264 0 klætt .
SFX 264 0 klødd .
SFX 264 0 kløddum .

#afturgjørdur
SFX 265 N 9
SFX 265 0 gjørd .
SFX 265 0 gjørda .
SFX 265 0 gjørdan .
SFX 265 0 gjørdar .
SFX 265 0 gjørdari .
SFX 265 0 gjørdir .
SFX 265 0 gjørdum .
SFX 265 0 gjørdur .
SFX 265 0 gjørt .

#døglingseyga
SFX 266 N 11
SFX 266 0 eyga .
SFX 266 0 eygað .
SFX 266 0 eygans .
SFX 266 0 eyganum .
SFX 266 0 eygna .
SFX 266 0 eygnanna .
SFX 266 0 eygu .
SFX 266 0 eygum .
SFX 266 0 eyguni .
SFX 266 0 eygunum .
SFX 266 0 eygur .

#avsiga
SFX 267 N 2
SFX 267 d t .
SFX 267 0 ur .

#bakkakjøt
SFX 268 N 6
SFX 268 0 kjøt .
SFX 268 0 kjøti .
SFX 268 0 kjøtið .
SFX 268 0 kjøtinum .
SFX 268 0 kjøts .
SFX 268 0 kjøtsins .

#akslarliður
SFX 269 N 15
SFX 269 0 lið .
SFX 269 0 liða .
SFX 269 0 liðanna .
SFX 269 0 liði .
SFX 269 0 liðin .
SFX 269 0 liðinum .
SFX 269 0 liðir .
SFX 269 0 liðirnar .
SFX 269 0 liðirnir .
SFX 269 0 liðs .
SFX 269 0 liðsins .
SFX 269 0 liðum .
SFX 269 0 liðunum .
SFX 269 0 liður .
SFX 269 0 liðurin .

#eygleiðari
SFX 270 N 12
SFX 270 0 leiðara .
SFX 270 0 leiðaran .
SFX 270 0 leiðaranna .
SFX 270 0 leiðarans .
SFX 270 0 leiðaranum .
SFX 270 0 leiðarar .
SFX 270 0 leiðararnar .
SFX 270 0 leiðararnir .
SFX 270 0 leiðari .
SFX 270 0 leiðarin .
SFX 270 0 leiðarum .
SFX 270 0 leiðarunum .

#burðardrongur
SFX 271 N 19
SFX 271 0 dreingi .
SFX 271 0 dreinginum .
SFX 271 0 dreingir .
SFX 271 0 dreingirnar .
SFX 271 0 dreingirnir .
SFX 271 0 dreingja .
SFX 271 0 dreingjanna .
SFX 271 0 dreingjar .
SFX 271 0 dreingjarins .
SFX 271 0 dreingjum .
SFX 271 0 dreingjunum .
SFX 271 0 drong .
SFX 271 0 drongi .
SFX 271 0 drongin .
SFX 271 0 dronginum .
SFX 271 0 drongs .
SFX 271 0 drongsins .
SFX 271 0 drongur .
SFX 271 0 drongurin .

#baksvartur
SFX 272 N 9
SFX 272 0 svart .
SFX 272 0 svarta .
SFX 272 0 svartan .
SFX 272 0 svartar .
SFX 272 0 svartari .
SFX 272 0 svartir .
SFX 272 0 svartur .
SFX 272 0 svørt .
SFX 272 0 svørtum .

#afturmastur
SFX 273 N 9
SFX 273 0 a .
SFX 273 0 anna .
SFX 273 0 ar .
SFX 273 0 arinnar .
SFX 273 0 arnar .
SFX 273 0 ina .
SFX 273 0 ini .
SFX 273 0 um .
SFX 273 0 unum .

#bjargingarbúni
SFX 274 N 12
SFX 274 0 búna .
SFX 274 0 búnan .
SFX 274 0 búnanna .
SFX 274 0 búnans .
SFX 274 0 búnanum .
SFX 274 0 búnar .
SFX 274 0 búnarnar .
SFX 274 0 búnarnir .
SFX 274 0 búni .
SFX 274 0 búnin .
SFX 274 0 búnum .
SFX 274 0 búnunum .

#akkersgrunnur
SFX 275 N 15
SFX 275 0 grunn .
SFX 275 0 grunna .
SFX 275 0 grunnanna .
SFX 275 0 grunnar .
SFX 275 0 grunnarnar .
SFX 275 0 grunnarnir .
SFX 275 0 grunni .
SFX 275 0 grunnin .
SFX 275 0 grunninum .
SFX 275 0 grunnum .
SFX 275 0 grunnunum .
SFX 275 0 grunnur .
SFX 275 0 grunnurin .
SFX 275 0 gruns .
SFX 275 0 grunsins .

#apaldgráur
SFX 276 N 9
SFX 276 0 grá .
SFX 276 0 gráa .
SFX 276 0 gráan .
SFX 276 0 gráar .
SFX 276 0 gráari .
SFX 276 0 gráir .
SFX 276 0 grátt .
SFX 276 0 gráum .
SFX 276 0 gráur .

#abbadóttir
SFX 277 N 6
SFX 277 r ur .
SFX 277 r urnar .
SFX 277 0 a .
SFX 277 0 anna .
SFX 277 0 um .
SFX 277 0 unum .

#arbeiðslag
SFX 278 N 6
SFX 278 0 lag .
SFX 278 0 lagi .
SFX 278 0 lagið .
SFX 278 0 lagnum .
SFX 278 0 lags .
SFX 278 0 lagsins .

#alskhugur
SFX 279 N 10
SFX 279 0 hug .
SFX 279 0 hugar .
SFX 279 0 hugarins .
SFX 279 0 hugi .
SFX 279 0 hugin .
SFX 279 0 huginum .
SFX 279 0 hugs .
SFX 279 0 hugsins .
SFX 279 0 hugur .
SFX 279 0 hugurin .

#avmæltur
SFX 280 N 8
SFX 280 0 mælt .
SFX 280 0 mælta .
SFX 280 0 mæltan .
SFX 280 0 mæltar .
SFX 280 0 mæltari .
SFX 280 0 mæltir .
SFX 280 0 mæltum .
SFX 280 0 mæltur .

#akkersflíggj
SFX 281 N 8
SFX 281 j i .
SFX 281 j ið .
SFX 281 j ini .
SFX 281 j inum .
SFX 281 0 a .
SFX 281 0 anna .
SFX 281 0 um .
SFX 281 0 unum .

#bakkaboð
SFX 282 N 6
SFX 282 0 boð .
SFX 282 0 boða .
SFX 282 0 boðanna .
SFX 282 0 boðini .
SFX 282 0 boðum .
SFX 282 0 boðunum .

#áarsjóð
SFX 283 N 6
SFX 283 0 i .
SFX 283 0 ið .
SFX 283 0 inum .
SFX 283 0 num .
SFX 283 0 s .
SFX 283 0 sins .
