third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.dic
borð/552,93,113,77,274,252,326,294,200,365,83,425,169,218,399,4,699,361,31,184,337,89,305,370,251,27,346,211
brúðarvals/255
deyðseyða/1,268,153,368,382,363
doktara/1,93,262,133,123,431,161,316,60,313
drykkju/1,250,31,20,45,356,216,60,89,459
drýl/156,252,7
dýra/1,197,81,402,404,260,189
dystingar/1,261
eftirdøtt/256
ein/1,637,378,374,50,25,246,264,58,261,12,148,235,45,280,263,388,116,187,193,324,383,165,104
embætismanna/1,253,106
ertr/1,273
eyg/1,241,276,270,148,410,272,22
eygna/1,113,448,254,83,445,399,319,31,36,440,402,450,216,199,85,188,447,432
felags/1,111,77,329,171,425,50,12,257,380,45,228,240,150,369,107,300,106
fíggjar/1,170,204,169,12,154,20,106,345,97,237,126,275,334,72,152,222,270
fjar/6,111,205,285,322,428,202,58,219,263,307,186,225,412,345,14
fram/1,113,124,353,252,294,304,105,378,259,276,169,181,399,26,322,408,270,300,257,148,207,235,219,195,20,49,230,159,258,186,324,349,288,345,272,146,386,165,70,447,298,97,84,346,262,284,250
framleiðslu/1,152,237,269,249,334,373,375,231,297,160,459
frí/87,6,77,205,38,468,61,265,378,259,374,319,359,343,20,137,167,150,132,175,249,123,209,173
friðartil/1,259,165
froskmans/1,274
gima/1,268,153,287
góð/128,75,265,674,279,26,58,302,263,187,193,97,9,100,90
gøllheld/1,267
grønertr/1,273
haga/1,282,291,38,330,215,143,107,81,378,259,141,83,245,341,153,172,36,440,154,20,137,230,131,379,239,188,363
hálandsdans/255
hámarksskatt/256
heildar/1,141,31,410,114,260
hellu/1,92,143,245,20,258
hevndar/1,342,279,36,116
hjálpar/1,111,197,51,4,86,36,192,79,402,328,20,161,226,95,370,231,275,222,432
hjartar/1,271,250,4,377
hug/6,262,205,254,179,284,238,215,296,304,4,31,36,207,79,302,45,114,349,317,289,199,293,312,165,298,97,725,90
húsmøðr/1,277
hvít/19,96,37,264,117,433,12,263,14
hyljingar/1,274
ill/1,6,262,254,306,128,304,105,75,265,259,276,342,181,180,172,148,333,280,263,159,60,345,272,339,298,100,90,160
illveðursskýggj/281
ilsku/1,254
ím/13,6,276,308,22
jarð/1,552,403,344,179,423,215,139,354,204,50,82,31,428,217,36,12,287,323,199,412,85,251,55
javn/1,6,291,197,431,141,276,181,4,23,401,261,12,201,49,226,388,72,345,298,84,104,297,186
kápu/1,113,276,445,86,148,20,114,159,272
kirkju/1,170,331,96,274,285,38,123,51,107,105,81,259,341,250,50,360,264,180,86,192,12,404,20,20,45,161,176,314,95,72,199,239,453,305,146,414,70,125,182,270,358
kjallaravind/1,266
knæ/1,423,269,312
kodd/1,252,327
kokain/283
kommunustýris/1,257
kortlagd/1,267
kring/259,58,258,7,14,186
land/30,13,6,62,415,124,429,128,215,92,329,378,259,275,11,359,217,310,320,230,287,97,100,249,143,389
lesingar/1,151,271,365,279
lomviga/1,266,294,81,144,324,362,427,339
lyndis/1,215,278,137
mann/592,545,6,488,423,51,139,204,105,81,456,265,378,141,341,144,11,322,36,12,79,302,410,114,316,295,240,312,166,104,297,468,12
miðlingadøtr/1,277
múl/1,113,179,306,128,276,181,148,272,22
niðurflytingar/1,253
øsku/1,331,38,271,397,148,440,276
pardans/255
plett/256
regnskýggj/281
ryggjarblóð/283
sagd/1,267
sálar/1,266,139,354,204,36,12,380,402,216,289,312
seðla/1,96,260
seiðalivr/1,273
seyða/1,170,93,113,415,291,271,294,245,425,442,250,279,286,50,268,180,148,440,79,20,137,216,368,72,189,166,97,382,100
silda/1,113,448,92,275,377,79,333,95,222,339,160,132
sjálvstýrisav/1,251
skálka/1,254,326,75,112,12
skeiv/1,254,117,263,104
skemtar/1,4,261,102
skinn/1,93,156,77,96,168,179,181,264,165,382
skips/1,93,282,174,96,452,353,123,51,286,380,219,20,228,161
skúla/1,285,457,197,105,81,259,214,402,20,45,340,106,209,95,152,453,70,170,151,77,38,271,365,341,50,328,270,154,161,72,146,407,89
smá/1,6,151,93,113,271,128,92,51,143,365,245,286,377,359,153,58,12,229,20,45,114,280,102,167,307,85,370,146,383,414,104,77,415,253,285,374,189
snúður/39,259,368
snúnings/1,296,269,132
sólar/1,38,266,399,278,36,137,324,100
søluum/1,262
sorgar/1,151,282,179,274,38,200,112,264,180,31,261,12,235,49,349,146,132,298
søt/19,6,26,58,12,280,427,14
starv/30,6,116,187,193,258,84,186
starvsfólka/1,38,253,107
stiks/1,252
stjórnar/1,126,197,4,278,12,257,79,161,72,77,107,270,225,132
toll/6,455,426,171,144,23,327,154,45,398,89,142,565,22,90,249,72
um/1,262,344,124,179,291,457,238,296,75,378,214,319,112,185,202,172,235,45,258,349,225,72,379,189,386,165,251,104,182,265,428,417,186
